District of Columbia statutes.
16-909.02

Full faith and credit to parentage determinations by other states.

The District of Columbia government shall give full faith and credit to the determinations of parentage made by other states, whether established through voluntary acknowledgment or through an administrative or judicial process.

History

Mar. 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-223, § 2(d), 41 DCR 8051
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 18-33, § 3(f), 56 DCR 4269

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-909.2.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-33 substituted “parentage” for “paternity”.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102(b) of the Paternity Acknowledgment and Gas Station Advisory Board Re-establishment Temporary Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-206, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2401).

Editor's Notes

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 3 of D.C. Law 10-223 provided that, pursuant to Subtitle I of Chapter 15 of Title 1, the Mayor may issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.

Section 28(b)(1) of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that the section designation of § 16-901.2 of the District of Columbia Official Code is redesignated as § 16-901.02.